Vermont, session 2025-2026, H856.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 4202a is added to read:
§ 4202a. DRUG USE HEALTH AND SAFETY ADVISORY BOARD
(a) There is hereby created the Drug Use Health and Safety Advisory
Board composed of experts in the fields of general and behavioral health care,
VT LEG #385364 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.856
2026 Page 2 of 13
substance use disorder treatment, harm reduction services, and drug user
communities.
(b) The primary objectives of the Advisory Board shall be to determine the
benchmark personal use supply for each regulated drug. The benchmarks
determined pursuant to this subsection shall be determined with a goal of
preventing and reducing the criminalization of personal drug possession and
use.
(c) The Advisory Board shall be composed of the following 13 members:
(1) two consumer representatives who have lived experience in drug use
and consumption practices, appointed by the Senate Committee on
Committees;
(2) two representatives from harm reduction service providers,
appointed by the Senate Committee on Committees;
(3) one expert on substance use disorder treatment and recovery, which
may include a medical practitioner providing medication for opioid use
disorder, appointed by the Senate Committee on Committees;
(4) one academic expert specializing in human behavior, addiction, and
drug policy, appointed by the Senate Committee on Committees;
(5) two consumer representatives who have lived experience in drug use
and consumption practices, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
VT LEG #385364 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.856
2026 Page 3 of 13
(6) two representatives from harm reduction service providers,
appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(7) one expert on substance use disorder treatment and recovery, which
may include a medical practitioner providing medication for opioid use
disorder, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(8) one academic expert specializing in human behavior, addiction, and
drug policy, appointed by the Speaker of the House; and
(9) one expert on legal reform appointed by the Center for Justice
Reform at Vermont Law and Graduate School.
(d) Upon convening, the members of the Advisory Board shall elect a chair
by majority vote and shall fill any vacancy of the Chair by the same. A
majority of members shall constitute a quorum.
(e) On or before January 1, 2027, the Advisory Board shall provide the
recommended quantities for benchmark personal use supply for each category
of regulated drug listed in subdivision 4201(29) of this title.
(f) The Advisory Board shall convene at least one time per year to review
benchmarks established pursuant to this section and recommend any necessary
amendments. The Chair of the Advisory Board may, with the consent of a
majority of members, convene additional meetings to receive testimony from
experts on drug use, substance use disorder, and medical research or practice
relating to any specific drug.
VT LEG #385364 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.856
2026 Page 4 of 13
(g) The Department shall initiate rulemaking to adopt benchmark personal
use supplies not later than 90 days following the receipt of recommendations
from the Advisory Board. The Department shall give full consideration to the
recommendations of the Advisory Board and provide detailed explanations for
any deviations from the recommendations of the Advisory Board in the
proposed rules.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 4231 is amended to read:
§ 4231. COCAINE
(a) Possession.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing cocaine shall be
imprisoned not more than one year six months or fined not more than
$2,000.00 $500.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing cocaine in an
amount consisting of 2.5 grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing cocaine shall be imprisoned
not more than five two years or fined not more than $100,000.00 $5,000.00, or
both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing cocaine in an
amount consisting of one ounce or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing cocaine shall be imprisoned
not more than 10 years or fined not more than $250,000.00, or both.
VT LEG #385364 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.856
2026 Page 5 of 13
(4) [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 4232 is amended to read:
§ 4232. LSD
(a) Possession.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing lysergic acid
diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than one year six months or fined
not more than $2,000.00 $500.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing lysergic acid
diethylamide in an amount consisting of 100 milligrams or more of one or
more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing lysergic
acid diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than five two years or fined
not more than $25,000.00 $2,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing lysergic acid
diethylamide in an amount consisting of one gram or more of one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing lysergic acid
diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more
than $100,000.00, or both.
(4) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing lysergic acid
diethylamide in an amount consisting of 10 grams or more of one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing lysergic acid
VT LEG #385364 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.856
2026 Page 6 of 13
diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than 20 years or fined not more
than $500,000.00, or both.
* * *
Sec. 4. 18 V.S.A. § 4233 is amended to read:
§ 4233. HEROIN
(a) Possession.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing heroin shall be
imprisoned not more than one year six months or fined not more than
$2,000.00 $500.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing heroin in an amount
consisting of 200 milligrams one gram or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing heroin shall be imprisoned not
more than five two years or fined not more than $100,000.00 $5,000.00, or
both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing heroin in an amount
consisting of one gram 2.5 grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing heroin shall be imprisoned not
more than 10 five years or fined not more than $250,000.00, or both.
(4) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing heroin in an amount
consisting of two five grams or more of one or more preparations, compounds,
VT LEG #385364 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.856
2026 Page 7 of 13
mixtures, or substances containing heroin shall be imprisoned not more than 20
years or fined not more than $1,000,000.00, or both.
* * *
(c) Trafficking. A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing heroin in
an amount consisting of 3.5 seven grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing heroin with the intent to sell or
dispense the heroin shall be imprisoned not more than 30 years or fined not
more than $1,000,000.00, or both. There shall be a permissive inference that a
person who possesses heroin in an amount of 3.5 seven grams or more of one
or more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing heroin
intends to sell or dispense the heroin. The amount of possessed heroin under
this subsection to sustain a charge of conspiracy under 13 V.S.A. § 1404 shall
be no not less than 10 grams in the aggregate.
* * *
Sec. 5. 18 V.S.A. § 4234 is amended to read:
§ 4234. DEPRESSANT, STIMULANT, AND NARCOTIC DRUGS
(a) Possession.
(1)(A) Except as provided by subdivision (B) of this subdivision (1), a
person knowingly and unlawfully possessing a depressant, stimulant, or
narcotic drug, other than heroin or cocaine, shall be imprisoned not more than
one year six months or fined not more than $2,000.00 $500.00, or both.
VT LEG #385364 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.856
2026 Page 8 of 13
(B) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing 224 milligrams
or less of buprenorphine shall not be punished in accordance with subdivision
(A) of this subdivision (1).
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing a depressant,
stimulant, or narcotic drug, other than heroin or cocaine, consisting of 100
times a benchmark unlawful dosage or its equivalent shall be imprisoned not
more than five two years or fined not more than $25,000.00 $2,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing a depressant,
stimulant, or narcotic drug, other than heroin or cocaine, consisting of 1,000
times a benchmark unlawful dosage or its equivalent shall be imprisoned not
more than 10 years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or both.
(4) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing a depressant,
stimulant, or narcotic drug, other than heroin or cocaine, consisting of 10,000
times a benchmark unlawful dosage or its equivalent shall be imprisoned not
more than 20 years or fined not more than $500,000.00, or both.
(b) Selling or dispensing.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing a depressant,
stimulant, or narcotic drug, other than fentanyl, heroin, or cocaine, shall be
imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $75,000.00, or
both. A person knowingly and unlawfully selling a depressant, stimulant, or
VT LEG #385364 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.856
2026 Page 9 of 13
narcotic drug, other than fentanyl, cocaine, or heroin, shall be imprisoned not
more than five two years or fined not more than $25,000.00 $5,000.00, or both.
* * *
Sec. 6. 18 V.S.A. § 4234a is amended to read:
§ 4234a. METHAMPHETAMINE
(a) Possession.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing methamphetamine
shall be imprisoned not more than one year six months or fined not more than
$2,000.00 $500.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing methamphetamine in
an amount consisting of 2.5 grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing methamphetamine shall be
imprisoned not more than five two years or fined not more than $100,000.00
$5,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing methamphetamine in
an amount consisting of 25 grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing methamphetamine shall be
imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $250,000.00, or
both.
* * *
VT LEG #385364 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.856
2026 Page 10 of 13
Sec. 7. 18 V.S.A. § 4234b is amended to read:
§ 4234b. EPHEDRINE AND PSEUDOEPHEDRINE
(a) Possession.
(1) No person shall knowingly and unlawfully possess a drug product
containing ephedrine base, pseudoephedrine base, or phenylpropanolamine
base with the intent to use the product as a precursor to manufacture
methamphetamine or another controlled substance.
(2) A person who violates this subsection shall:
(A) if the offense involves possession of less than nine grams of
ephedrine base, pseudoephedrine base, or phenylpropanolamine base, be
imprisoned not more than one year six months or fined not more than
$2,000.00 $500.00, or both; and
(B) if the offense involves possession of nine or more grams of
ephedrine base, pseudoephedrine base, or phenylpropanolamine base, be
imprisoned not more than five two years or fined not more than $100,000.00
$5,000.00, or both.
* * *
(d) Applicability. This section shall not apply to a manufacturer that has
obtained an exemption from the Attorney General of the United States under
Section 711(d) of the federal Combat Methamphetamine Epidemic Act of
2005.
VT LEG #385364 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.856
2026 Page 11 of 13
(e) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Distributor” means a person, other than a manufacturer or
wholesaler, that sells, delivers, transfers, or in any manner furnishes a drug
product to any person that is not the ultimate user or consumer of the product.
(2) “Knowingly” means having actual knowledge of the relevant facts.
(3) “Manufacturer” means a person that produces, compounds,
packages, or in any manner initially prepares a drug product for sale or use.
(4) “Wholesaler” means a person, other than a manufacturer, that sells,
transfers, or in any manner furnishes a drug product to any other person for the
purpose of being resold.
Sec. 8. 18 V.S.A. § 4235 is amended to read:
§ 4235. HALLUCINOGENIC DRUGS
(a) Definition. “Dose” of a hallucinogenic drug means that minimum
amount of a hallucinogenic drug, not commonly used for therapeutic purposes,
that causes a substantial hallucinogenic effect. The Department of Health shall
adopt rules that establish doses for hallucinogenic drugs. The Department may
incorporate, where applicable, dosage calculations or schedules, whether
described as “dosage equivalencies” or otherwise, established by the federal
government.
VT LEG #385364 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.856
2026 Page 12 of 13
(b) Possession.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing a hallucinogenic
drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide, shall be imprisoned not more than
one year six months or fined not more than $2,000.00 $500.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing 10 or more doses of
a hallucinogenic drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide, shall be
imprisoned not more than five two years or fined not more than $25,000.00
$2,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing 100 or more doses of
a hallucinogenic drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide, shall be
imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or
both.
(4) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing 1,000 or more doses
of a hallucinogenic drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide, shall be
imprisoned not more than 15 years or fined not more than $500,000.00, or
both.
* * *
Sec. 9. 18 V.S.A. § 4235a is amended to read:
§ 4235a. ECSTASY
(a) Possession.
VT LEG #385364 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.856
2026 Page 13 of 13
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing Ecstasy shall be
imprisoned not more than one year six months or fined not more than
$2,000.00 $500.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing Ecstasy in an
amount consisting of two grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing Ecstasy shall be imprisoned
not more than five two years or fined not more than $25,000.00 $2,000.00, or
both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing Ecstasy in an
amount consisting of 20 grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing Ecstasy shall be imprisoned
not more than 10 years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or both.
(4) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing Ecstasy in an
amount consisting of seven ounces or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing Ecstasy shall be imprisoned
not more than 20 years or fined not more than $500,000.00, or both.
* * *
Sec. 10. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385364 v.2